test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-switma83_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `sõitma: # Verb (83) `nõstma 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     sõitma+V+Inf/mA: sõitma
     sõitma+V+Inf: sõitaq
     sõitma+V+ActPrtPrc: sõitnuq
     sõitma+V+PssPrtPrc: [sõidõt, sõidõtu]

     sõitma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: sõida
     sõitma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: [sõidat, sõidadõq]
     sõitma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: sõit
     sõitma+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: sõidamiq
     sõitma+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: sõidatiq
     sõitma+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: sõitvaq
     sõitma+V+Ind+Prs+Sc+ConNeg: sõida
     sõitma+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: [sõidi, sõitsõ]
     sõitma+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: [sõidit, sõidiq, sõididõq, sõitsõt, sõitsõq, sõitsõdõq]
     sõitma+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: [sõitʼ, sõitsõ]
     sõitma+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: [sõidimiq, sõitsõmiq]
     sõitma+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: [sõiditiq, sõitsõtiq]
     sõitma+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: [sõidiq, sõidivaq, sõitsõq, sõitsõvaq]
     sõitma+V+Ind+Prt+Sc+ConNeg: sõida

     sõitma+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg1: sõidõda
     sõitma+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3: sõidõtas

     sõitma+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Nom: sõitva

     sõitma+V+Jus: sõitkuq
